California, session 20252026, AB97.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17139.1 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17139.1. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2029, gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer. (b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from a settlement entity in connection with the 2020 Bobcat Fire. (2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following: (A) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Los Angeles during the 2020 Bobcat Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of the 2020 Bobcat Fire. (B) Any taxpayer that resided within the County of Los Angeles during the 2020 Bobcat Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of the 2020 Bobcat Fire. (C) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Los Angeles during the 2020 Bobcat Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of the 2020 Bobcat Fire. (3) “Settlement entity” means Southern California Edison or its subsidiary that is making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer. (c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board. (d) (1) For the purpose of complying with Section 41 in regards to the exclusion provided by this section and Section 24309.9, the Legislature finds and declares as follows: (A) The specific goal, purpose, and objective of the tax exclusion is to provide essential relief to individuals who have suffered injury, loss, inconvenience, and expenses resulting from the devastating 2020 Bobcat Fire. (B) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining if the exclusion achieves the stated goal, purpose, and objective shall be the number of qualified taxpayers that excluded qualified amounts from gross income, and the aggregate amount of settlement payments arising out of the 2020 Bobcat Fire.(2) (A) On December 1, 2029, the Franchise Tax Board shall deliver to the Legislature a written report that includes both of the following: (i) To the extent feasible, the number of qualified taxpayers that excluded qualified amounts from gross income, as a result of the exclusion. (ii) The aggregate amount of those settlement payments arising out of the 2020 Bobcat Fire. (B) The report required by this paragraph shall be delivered to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code. (C) The disclosure provisions of this subdivision shall be treated as an exception to Section 19542. (e) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 24309.9 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:24309.9. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2029, gross income does not include any qualified amount received by a qualified taxpayer. (b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Qualified amount” means any amount received in settlement by a qualified taxpayer from a settlement entity in connection with the 2020 Bobcat Fire.(2) “Qualified taxpayer” means any of the following: (A) Any taxpayer that owned real property located in the County of Los Angeles during the 2020 Bobcat Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of the 2020 Bobcat Fire. (B) Any taxpayer that had a place of business within the County of Los Angeles during the 2020 Bobcat Fire who paid or incurred expenses and received amounts from a settlement arising out of the 2020 Bobcat Fire.(3) “Settlement entity” means Southern California Edison or its subsidiary that is making the settlement payment to a qualified taxpayer. (c) The settlement entity shall provide, upon request by the Franchise Tax Board, documentation of the settlement payments in the form and manner requested by the Franchise Tax Board. (d) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that Sections 17139. and 24309.9 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as added by this act, are necessary for the public purpose of preventing undue hardship to taxpayers who reside, or used to reside, in a part of California devastated by wildfire, and do not constitute a gift of public funds within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. SEC. 4.  This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to provide essential relief to those persons who have suffered injury, loss, inconvenience, and expenses resulting from the devastating 2020 Bobcat Fire as soon as possible, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately. ___________________ REVISIONS: Heading–Line 2.___________________